seg/mar.2.dix
    <pardef n="/घे__vblex">
      <!-- infinitives -->
      <e>     <p><l>घेणे</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
      <!-- gerunds -->
      <!-- same as infinitive in the nominative -->
      <e>     <p><l>घेण</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>
      
      <!-- -->
      <e>         <p><l>घ्यायला</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>घेऊन</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>घेताना</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>घेतांना</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>  
      <e>     <p><l>घेत</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>घेता</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>घेऊ</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      
      <!-- adjectival forms -->
      <e>         <p><l>घेतलेल</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__big_suff"/></e>

      <!-- r problems -->
      <e>         <p><l>घेणा</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__gpr_gen"/></e>


      <!-- imperatives (CHECK p3) -->
      <e>     <p><l>घेऊ</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>घेऊ</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>घे</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>घे</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>घ्यावा</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>घेओ</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>घेओत</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- hortative -->
      <e>     <p><l>घेउया</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="incl"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>घेउयात</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="incl"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- बस-तो -->
      <e>     <p><l>घे</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_impfv"/></e>
      <!-- बस-लो -->
      <e>     <p><l>घेत</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_perf"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ीन fallback -->
      <e>     <p><l>घेईन</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>घेऊ</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>घेशील</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>घ्याल</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>घेइल</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>घेतील</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>घेणार</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- बस-लेलो -->
      <e>     <p><l>घेत</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_plup"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ायचो -->
      <e>     <p><l>घ्य</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_pred"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ावा -->
      <e>     <p><l>घ्य</l><r>घेणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_subj"/></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/म्हण__vblex">
      <!-- infinitives -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणणे</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
      <!-- gerunds -->
      <!-- same as infinitive in the nominative -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणण</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>
      
      <!-- -->
      <e>         <p><l>म्हणायला</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>म्हणून</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>म्हणताना</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>म्हणतांना</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>  
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणत</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>म्हणता</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>म्हणू</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      
      <!-- adjectival forms -->
      <e>         <p><l>म्हणालेल</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__big_suff"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>म्हटलेल</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="__big_suff"/></e>

      <!-- r problems -->
      <e>         <p><l>म्हणण</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__gpr_gen"/></e>


      <!-- imperatives (CHECK p3) -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणू</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणू</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>म्हण</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणा</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>म्हणो</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणोत</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- hortative -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणुया</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="incl"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>म्हणुयात</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="incl"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- बस-तो -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हण</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_impfv"/></e>
      <!-- बस-लो -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणा</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_perf"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>म्हट</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_perf"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ीन -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हण</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_fut"/></e>
      <!-- बस-लेलो -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हणा</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_plup"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>म्हट</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_plup"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ायचो -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हण</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_pred"/></e>
      <!-- बस-ावा -->
      <e>     <p><l>म्हण</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__vblex_subj"/></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="देणे">           <i></i><par n="/घे__vblex" /></e>
    <e lm="म्हण">           <i></i><par n="/म्हण__vblex" /></e>
